Louisiana, session 2026, SB179.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1952.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1952.2 City court of Jeanerette; territorial jurisdiction; effect on justice of
peace
The territorial jurisdiction of the city court of Jeanerette shall extend
throughout the portions of Iberia Parish designated as Precincts 10-1, 10-4, 11-
6, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4 and the portion of Precinct 11-1 west of the shoreline of
Lake Fausse Point. In such portions of those precincts that are outside of the
city of Jeanerette, the court shall have jurisdiction concurrent with the justice
of the peace in those cases in which the justice of the peace would have
jurisdiction.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-251 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 179